Maryland, session 2025, HB0885.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Public Safety
3–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0885*

HOUSE BILL 885
(d) “Exonerated” means that a police officer acted in accordance with the law and
agency policy.
(k) “Unfounded” means that the allegations against a police officer are not
supported by fact.
3–112.
(A) [A] IN THIS SECTION, “INVESTIGATION RECORD” MEANS A record relating
to an administrative or criminal investigation of misconduct by a police officer, including
an internal affairs investigatory record, a hearing record, and records relating to a
disciplinary decision[,].
(B) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION, AN
INVESTIGATION RECORD may not be:
(1) expunged; or
(2) destroyed by a law enforcement agency.
(C) IF A COMPLAINT OF MISCONDUCT BY A POLICE OFFICER RESULTS IN A
FINDING OF UNFOUNDED OR EXONERATED BY AN ADMINISTRATIVE CHARGING
COMMITTEE UNDER § 3–104 OF THIS SUBTITLE OR A TRIAL BOARD UNDER § 3–106
OF THIS SUBTITLE, ALL INVESTIGATION RECORDS RELATING TO THE COMPLAINT
SHALL BE REMOVED FROM THE POLICE OFFICER’S PERSONNEL RECORD 3 YEARS
AFTER THE ADMINISTRATIVE CHARGING COMMITTEE OR THE TRIAL BOARD ISSUES
ITS FINDING.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.